Hawaii statutes.
[§269-142] Reliability standards; interconnection
requirements; adoption and development; force and effect. (a) The
commission may adopt, by rule or order, reliability standards and
interconnection requirements. Reliability standards and interconnection
requirements adopted by the commission shall apply to any electric utility and
any user, owner, or operator of the Hawaii electric system. The commission
shall not contract for the performance of the functions under this subsection
to any other entity as provided under section 269-147.

(b) The commission may develop reliability
standards and interconnection requirements as it determines necessary or upon
recommendation from any entity, including an entity contracted by the
commission to serve as the Hawaii electricity reliability administrator
provided for under this part, for the continuing reliable design and operation
of the Hawaii electric system. Any reliability standard or interconnection
requirement developed by the commission shall be adopted by the commission in
accordance with subsection (a) in order to be effective. The commission shall
not contract for the performance of the functions under this subsection to any
other entity as provided under section 269-147.

(c) The commission shall have jurisdiction
over matters concerning interconnection requirements and interconnections
located in the State between electric utilities, any user, owner, or operator
of the Hawaii electric system, or any other person, business, or entity
connecting to the Hawaii electric system or otherwise applying to connect
generation or equipment providing ancillary services to, or operate generation
and equipment providing ancillary services in parallel with the Hawaii electric
system under processes established in accordance with section 269-145. Nothing
in this subsection is intended to give the commission general supervision
authority over any user, owner, or operator of the Hawaii electric system or
any other person, business, or entity that is not a public utility as defined
in section 269-1. [L 2012, c 166, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next